Montana, session 2025, HB280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is repealed:
2-15-225. Interagency coordinating council for state prevention programs.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 280
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 280, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 280
INTRODUCED BY L. BENNETT
AN ACT REPEALING THE INTERAGENCY COORDINATING COUNCIL FOR STATE PREVENTION
PROGRAMS; ELIMINATING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AND REPEALING SECTION 2-15-225, MCA.”